Utah statutes.
9-8-504.   Preservation easement -- Subject to other laws.
Except as provided in this part, preservation easements are subject to the
other laws of this state governing easements, generally.  Any preservation
easement may, with respect to the burdened land, entitle its owner to take
certain action, to require certain action to be taken by the owner of the
burdened land, or require that certain action not be taken by the owner of the
burdened land, and under any such circumstances may be either appurtenant or
in gross.
